Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. Commission; Commissioner

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 2; 14A M.J. Oysters, § 1.

§ 28.2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Commission”
means the Marine Resources Commission.

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner of Marine Resources.

“Fish”
or

“marine fish”

means those finfish species which spend a major portion of their lives in marine or estuarine waters. Sunfish, crappies, and carp are not considered to be marine fish.

“Fishing”, “fisheries”
or

“to fish”

means all operations involved in (i) taking or catching, (ii) using, setting or operating apparatus employed in killing, taking or catching, or (iii) transporting or preparing for market marine fish, shellfish, and marine organisms.

“Habitat”
means those state-owned bottomlands, tidal wetlands and coastal primary sand dunes which are subject to regulation under Subtitle III of this title.

“Marine organisms”
means those species other than marine finfish or marine shellfish which inhabit marine or estuarine waters. Terrapin and marine mammals are considered to be marine organisms.

“Marine shellfish”
or

“shellfish”

means such species of mollusca as oysters and clams, and such species of crustacea as crabs.

“Officer”
means a member of the Virginia Marine Police.

“Territorial sea”
means the waters within the belt, three nautical miles wide, that is adjacent to Virginia’s coast and seaward of the mean low-water mark.

“Tidewater Virginia”
means the following counties: Accomack, Arlington, Caroline, Charles City, Chesterfield, Essex, Fairfax, Gloucester, Hanover, Henrico, Isle of Wight, James City, King and Queen, King George, King William, Lancaster, Mathews, Middlesex, New Kent, Northampton, Northumberland, Prince George, Prince William, Richmond, Spotsylvania, Stafford, Surry, Westmoreland, and York; and the Cities of Alexandria, Chesapeake, Colonial Heights, Fairfax, Falls Church, Fredericksburg, Hampton, Hopewell, Newport News, Norfolk, Petersburg, Poquoson, Portsmouth, Richmond, Suffolk, Virginia Beach, and Williamsburg.

History.

Code 1950, §

28-1

; 1962, c. 406, §

28.1-1

; 1968, c. 746; 1972, c. 472; 1992, c. 836; 2002, c. 789.

Cross references.

As to the development of a State Minerals Management Plan providing for the exploration for and extraction of minerals on state-owned uplands, see §

2.2-1157

.

As to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

.

As to the Aquaculture Advisory Board, see Chapter 26 (§ 3.2-2600 et seq.) of Title 3.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 67, cl. 1 provides: “The Marine Resources Commission (the Commission) shall monitor any effort by the U.S. Department of the Interior to expand federal jurisdiction regarding fishing or shellfish harvesting in the waters adjoining the Assateague Island National Seashore. The Commission shall seek to preserve the right and ability of Virginia watermen to use such waters.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 789 substituted “Police” for “Patrol” at the end of the paragraph defining “Officer.”

§ 28.2-101.
Jurisdiction of Commission.

The jurisdiction of the Commission shall include the Commonwealth’s territorial sea and extend to the fall line of all tidal rivers and streams except in the case of state-owned bottomlands where jurisdiction extends throughout the Commonwealth. The Commission shall have jurisdiction over all commercial fishing and all marine fish, marine shellfish, marine organisms, and habitat in such areas. In waters of the Albemarle and Currituck watersheds, the Commission’s fisheries management jurisdiction is limited to the recreational and commercial harvest of blue crabs. The Commission’s jurisdiction shall also include the power to exercise regulatory authority over all structures and improvements built or proposed by riparian property owners in the Potomac River appurtenant to the shore of the Commonwealth. The Commission shall exercise such regulatory authority in the Potomac River consistent with the provisions of Subtitle III (§

28.2-1200

et seq.), and all regulations, guidance, and policies adopted thereunder.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-3; 1950, p. 979; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-3; 1968, c. 746; 1992, c. 836; 2005, c. 191; 2012, c. 595.

Cross references.

As to the jurisdiction of the Board of Wildlife Resources, see §§

29.1-103

through

29.1-106

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 595, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Marine Resources Commission pertaining to marine and brackish fish that are not currently regulated by the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries in the waters of the Albemarle and Currituck watersheds shall remain in full force and effect in those watersheds until regulations adopted by the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries pertaining to those species become effective.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 191 added the last two sentences.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 595 added the present third sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, § 25.

§ 28.2-102.
Commission membership; chairman; qualifications; terms; meetings.

The Commission shall consist of a chairman and eight additional members who, to the extent possible, shall be representative of all areas of interest in Virginia’s marine resources, including commercial, recreational and environmental interests. At least one member shall, at the time of his appointment, have earned his livelihood for at least five years by working on Virginia waters and shall be licensed and registered as a commercial fisherman as defined in §

28.2-241

, and one member shall be a representative of the sport fishing industry or a recreational fisherman who is not employed by the commercial fishing industry. The members, including the chairman, shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve at his pleasure.

The chairman and two members of the Commission shall hold office for terms coincident with the term of the Governor making the appointments, or until their successors have been appointed and qualified. The terms of the remaining six members shall expire July 1, 1997, and these same six members shall be reappointed effective July 1, 1997, as successors. Their terms shall be as follows: two members shall be appointed for two-year terms, two members shall be appointed for three-year terms, and two members shall be appointed for four-year terms or until their successors are appointed and qualified. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. No person, except the chairman, shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

The chairman shall be an experienced administrator with knowledge of seafood and marine affairs. He shall serve as Commissioner of Marine Resources.

Five members shall constitute a quorum of the Commission.

The Commission shall meet on the call of the chairman or three members at such times as he or they may deem necessary, and at such places as he or they may designate.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-11, 28-12, 28-17; 1956, c. 270; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-4, 28.1-5, 28.1-10; 1968, c. 746; 1980, c. 387; 1987, c. 574; 1992, c. 836; 1997, c. 284; 1998, c. 161; 1999, c. 551.

§ 28.2-103.
General powers of Commission; promulgation of regulations.

The Commission shall exercise all of the powers herein conferred and may promulgate regulations and guidelines necessary to carry out the provisions of this title. Marine fisheries regulations shall be promulgated according to the procedures established in Article 2 (§

28.2-209

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of this title. Habitat management regulations and guidelines shall be promulgated in accordance with the procedures established in Article 2 (§

28.2-209

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of this title, unless specifically provided in subdivision A 8 or A 11 of §

2.2-4006

or subsection C of §

2.2-4011

.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-16; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-9; 1972, c. 711, § 62.1-13.4; 1973, c. 148; 1982, c. 300; 1990, c. 811; 1992, c. 836; 1997, c. 845; 2010, c. 65.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 449, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Marine Resources Commission (the Commission) shall adopt regulations to establish and implement a fast-track permitting program that authorizes the selection and use of appropriate sites in Tidewater Virginia, as defined in §

28.2-100

of the Code of Virginia, for the disposal of material dredged in such region, with such regulations to be effective no later than July 1, 2019. The Commission’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Commission shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 65 substituted “subdivision A 8 or A 11” for “subdivision A 9 or A 12.”

§ 28.2-104.
Commissioner; general powers and duties.

The Commissioner shall:

Enforce the marine fishery and habitat laws and regulations;

Serve as chief executive officer of the Commission and devote full time to the duties of the office;

Appoint all personnel; and

Establish and equip a permanent office on the Virginia Peninsula.

For purposes of this section, “Virginia Peninsula” shall include the Cities of Hampton, Newport News, Williamsburg, and Poquoson, and the Counties of James City and York.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-11, 28-16, 28-18, 28-19, 28-20; 1952, c. 177; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-4, 28.1-9, 28.1-11, 28.1-12, 28.1-13, 28.1-23; 1968, c. 749; 1973, c. 148; 1983, c. 318; 1984, c. 463; 1992, c. 836; 2009, c. 103.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 103 substituted “on the Virginia Peninsula” for “in the City of Newport News” in subdivision 4; and added the last paragraph.

§ 28.2-104.1.
Living shorelines; development of general permit; guidance.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Living shoreline” means a shoreline management practice that provides erosion control and water quality benefits; protects, restores, or enhances natural shoreline habitat; and maintains coastal processes through the strategic placement of plants, stone, sand fill, and other structural and organic materials. When practicable, a living shoreline may enhance coastal resilience and attenuation of wave energy and storm surge.

“Other structural and organic materials” means materials or features that provide added protection or stability for the natural shoreline habitat components of a living shoreline that attenuate wave energy and do not interfere with natural coastal processes or the natural continuity of the land-water interface. “Other structural and organic materials” may be composed of a variety of natural or man-made materials, including rock, concrete, wood fiber, oyster shells, and geotextiles; however, structural features shall be free from contaminants and shall be adequately secured to prevent full or partial dislodging or detachment due to wave action or other natural forces.

The Commission, in cooperation with the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Environmental Quality, and local wetlands boards, and with technical assistance from the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, shall establish and implement a general permit regulation that authorizes and encourages the use of living shorelines as the preferred alternative for stabilizing tidal shorelines in the Commonwealth. The regulation shall provide for an expedited permit review process for qualifying living shoreline projects requiring authorization under Chapters 12 (§

28.2-1200

et seq.), 13 (§

28.2-1300

et seq.), and 14 (§

28.2-1400

et seq.). In developing the general permit, the Commission shall consult with the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers to ensure the minimization of conflicts with federal law and regulation.

The Commission, in cooperation with the Department of Conservation and Recreation and with technical assistance from the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, shall develop integrated guidance for the management of tidal shoreline systems to provide a technical basis for the coordination of permit decisions required by any regulatory entity exercising authority over a shoreline management project. The guidance shall:

Communicate to stakeholders and regulatory authorities that it is the policy of the Commonwealth to support living shorelines as the preferred alternative for stabilizing tidal shorelines;

Identify preferred shoreline management approaches for the shoreline types found in the Commonwealth;

Explain the risks and benefits of protection provided by various shoreline system elements associated with each management option; and

Recommend procedures to achieve efficiency and effectiveness by the various regulatory entities exercising authority over a shoreline management project.

The Commission shall permit only living shoreline approaches to shoreline management unless the best available science shows that such approaches are not suitable. If the best available science shows that a living shoreline approach is not suitable, the Commission shall require the applicant to incorporate, to the maximum extent possible, elements of living shoreline approaches into permitted projects.

History.

2011, c. 885; 2014, cc. 112, 143; 2020, cc. 566, 809; 2022, c. 333.

Cross references.

As to loans to local governments for living shorelines, see §

62.1-229.5

.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 112 and 143 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “the Department of Environmental Quality” and “local wetlands boards, and” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 566 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments by c. 809 added subsection D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 333 added the definition of “Other structural and organic materials” in subsection A.

§ 28.2-105.
Legal representation for employees in criminal prosecution; compensation.

If any Commission employee is prosecuted on any criminal charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his official duties, the Commissioner may employ special counsel approved by the Attorney General to defend the employee. The compensation for special counsel shall, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, be paid out of the funds appropriated for the administration of the Commission.

History.

1980, c. 255, § 28.1-12.1; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to legal services to persons appointed by the Commissioner of Marine Resources in civil matters, see §

2.2-507

.